California statutes. Civil Code
-------------------------------------------

6626.

(a) The certificate consenting to the recordation of a condominium plan that is required by subdivision (c) of Section 6624 shall be signed and acknowledged by all of the following persons:

(1) The record owner of fee title to that property included in the condominium project.

(2) In the case of a condominium project that will
terminate upon the termination of an estate for years, by all lessors and lessees of the estate for years.

(3) In the case of a condominium project subject to a life estate, by all life tenants and remainder interests.

(4) The trustee or the beneficiary of each recorded deed of trust, and the mortgagee of each recorded mortgage encumbering the property.

(b) Owners of mineral rights, easements, rights-of-way, and other nonpossessory interests do not need to sign the certificate.

(c) In the event a conversion to condominiums of a stock cooperative has been approved by the required number of owners, trustees, beneficiaries, and mortgagees pursuant to Section 66452.10 of the Government Code, the certificate need only be signed by those owners, trustees,
beneficiaries, and mortgagees approving the conversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6628.

A condominium plan may be amended or revoked by a recorded instrument that is acknowledged and signed by all the persons who, at the time of amendment or revocation, are persons whose signatures are required under Section 6626.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Operating Rules [6630. - 6632.]

6630.

For the purposes of this article, “operating rule” means a regulation adopted by the board that applies generally to the management and operation of the common interest development or the conduct of the business and affairs of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6632.

An operating rule is valid and enforceable only if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The rule is in writing.

(b) The rule is within the authority of the board conferred by law or by the declaration, articles of incorporation or association, or bylaws of the association.

(c) The rule is not in conflict with governing law and the declaration, articles of incorporation or association, or bylaws of the association.

(d) The rule is reasonable, and is adopted, amended, or repealed in good faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Ownership and Transfer of Interests [6650. - 6670.]



  ARTICLE 1. Ownership Rights and Interests [6650. - 6654.]

6650.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, in a condominium project, or in a planned development in which the common area is owned by the owners of the separate interests, the common area is owned as tenants in common, in equal shares, one for each separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6652.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides:

(a) In a condominium project, and in those planned developments with common area owned in common by the owners of the separate interests, there are appurtenant to each separate interest nonexclusive rights of ingress, egress, and support, if necessary, through the common area. The common area is subject to these rights.

(b) In a stock cooperative, and in a planned development with common area owned by the association, there is an easement for ingress, egress, and support, if necessary, appurtenant to each separate interest. The common area is subject to these easements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6654.

Except as otherwise provided in law, an order of the court, or an order pursuant to a final and binding arbitration decision, an association may not deny a member or occupant physical access to the member’s or occupant’s separate interest, either by restricting access through the common area to the separate interest, or by restricting access solely to the separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Restrictions on Transfers [6656. - 6660.]

6656.

(a) Except as provided in this section, the common area in a condominium project shall remain undivided, and there shall be no judicial partition thereof. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit partition of a cotenancy in a condominium.

(b) The owner of a separate interest in a condominium project may maintain a partition action as to the entire project as if the owners of all of the
separate interests in the project were tenants in common in the entire project in the same proportion as their interests in the common area. The court shall order partition under this subdivision only by sale of the entire condominium project and only upon a showing of one of the following:

(1) More than three years before the filing of the action, the condominium project was damaged or destroyed, so that a material part was rendered unfit for its prior use, and the condominium project has not been rebuilt or repaired substantially to its state prior to the damage or destruction.

(2) Three-fourths or more of the project is destroyed or substantially damaged and owners of separate interests holding in the aggregate more than a 50-percent interest in the common area oppose repair or restoration of the project.

(3) The
project has been in existence more than 50 years, is obsolete and uneconomic, and owners of separate interests holding in the aggregate more than a 50-percent interest in the common area oppose repair or restoration of the project.

(4) Any conditions in the declaration for sale under the circumstances described in this subdivision have been met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6658.

(a) In a common interest development, no labor performed or services or materials furnished with the consent of, or at the request of, an owner in the common interest development or the owners’ agent or contractor shall be the basis for the filing of a lien against any other property of any other owner in the common interest development unless that other owner has expressly consented to or requested the performance of
the labor or furnishing of the materials or services. However, express consent shall be deemed to have been given by the owner of any separate interest in the case of emergency repairs thereto.

(b) Labor performed or services or materials furnished for the common area, if duly authorized by the association, shall be deemed to be performed or furnished with the express consent of each separate interest owner.

(c) The owner of any separate interest may remove that owner’s separate interest from a lien against two or more separate interests or any part thereof by doing either of the following:

(1) Pay to the holder of the lien the fraction of the total sum secured by the lien that is attributable to the owner’s separate interest.

(2) Record a lien release
bond, pursuant to Section 8424, in an amount equal to 125 percent of the sum secured by the lien that is attributable to the owner’s separate interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   (AB 534)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6660.

If the association is served with a claim of lien pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 8000) for a work of improvement on a common area, the association shall, within 60 days of service, give individual notice to the members, pursuant to Section 6514.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 44, Sec. 4.   (AB 534)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transfer of Separate Interest [6662. - 6670.]

6662.

In a condominium project the common area is not subject to partition, except as provided in Section 6656. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the separate interest includes the undivided interest in the common area. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the owner’s entire estate also includes the owner’s membership interest in the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6664.

In a planned development, any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the separate interest includes the undivided interest in the common area, if any exists. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the owner’s entire estate also includes the owner’s membership interest in the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6666.

In a stock cooperative, any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the separate interest includes the ownership interest in the corporation, however evidenced. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the owner’s entire estate also includes the owner’s membership interest in the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6668.

Nothing in this article prohibits the transfer of exclusive use areas, independent of any other interest in a common interest subdivision, if authorization to separately transfer exclusive use areas is expressly stated in the declaration and the transfer occurs in accordance with the terms of the declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6670.

Any restrictions upon the severability of the component interests in real property which are contained in the declaration shall not be deemed conditions repugnant to the interest created within the meaning of Section 711. However, these restrictions shall not extend beyond the period in which the right to partition a project is suspended under Section 6656.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Property Use and Maintenance [6700. - 6722.]



  ARTICLE 1. Protected Uses [6700. - 6713.]

6700.

This article includes provisions that limit the authority of an association or the governing documents to regulate the use of a member’s separate interest. Nothing in this article is intended to affect the application of any other provision that limits the authority of an association to regulate the use of a member’s separate interest, including, but not limited to, the following provisions:

(a) Sections 712 and 713,
relating to the display of signs.

(b) Sections 714 and 714.1, relating to solar energy systems.

(c) Section 714.5, relating to structures that are constructed offsite and moved to the property in sections or modules.

(d) Sections 782, 782.5, and 6150 of this code and Section 12956.1 of the Government Code, relating to racial restrictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

(a) Except as required for the protection of the public health or safety, no governing document shall limit or prohibit, or be construed to limit or prohibit, the display of the flag of the United States by a member on or in the member’s separate interest or within the member’s exclusive use common area.

(b) For purposes of this section, “display of the flag of the United States” means a flag of the
United States made of fabric, cloth, or paper displayed from a staff or pole or in a window, and does not mean a depiction or emblem of the flag of the United States made of lights, paint, roofing, siding, paving materials, flora, or balloons, or any other similar building, landscaping, or decorative component.

(c) In any action to enforce this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6704.

(a) The governing documents may not prohibit posting or displaying of noncommercial signs, posters, flags, or banners on or in a member’s separate interest, except as required for the protection of public health or safety or if the posting or display would violate a local, state, or federal law.

(b) For purposes of this section, a noncommercial sign, poster, flag, or banner may be made of paper,
cardboard, cloth, plastic, or fabric, and may be posted or displayed from the yard, window, door, balcony, or outside wall of the separate interest, but may not be made of lights, roofing, siding, paving materials, flora, or balloons, or any other similar building, landscaping, or decorative component, or include the painting of architectural surfaces.

(c) An association may prohibit noncommercial signs and posters that are more than nine square feet in size and noncommercial flags or banners that are more than 15 square feet in size.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6706.

Notwithstanding Section 4202, Section 4715 applies to an owner of a separate interest in a common interest development who kept a pet in that common interest development before January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6708.

(a) Any covenant, condition, or restriction contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, a common interest development that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation or use of a video or television antenna, including a satellite dish, or that effectively prohibits or restricts the attachment of that antenna to a structure within that development where the antenna is not
visible from any street or common area, except as otherwise prohibited or restricted by law, is void and unenforceable as to its application to the installation or use of a video or television antenna that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less.

(b) This section shall not apply to any covenant, condition, or restriction, as described in subdivision (a), that imposes reasonable restrictions on the installation or use of a video or television antenna, including a satellite dish, that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less. For purposes of this section, “reasonable restrictions” means those restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of the video or television antenna system, including all related equipment, or significantly decrease its efficiency or performance and include all of the following:

(1) Requirements for application
and notice to the association prior to the installation.

(2) Requirement of a member to obtain the approval of the association for the installation of a video or television antenna that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less on a separate interest owned by another.

(3) Provision for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of roofs or other building components.

(4) Requirements for installers of a video or television antenna to indemnify or reimburse the association or its members for loss or damage caused by the installation, maintenance, or use of a video or television antenna that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less.

(c) Whenever approval is required for the installation or use of a video or television
antenna, including a satellite dish, the application for approval shall be processed by the appropriate approving entity for the common interest development in the same manner as an application for approval of an architectural modification to the property, and the issuance of a decision on the application shall not be willfully delayed.

(d) In any action to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6710.

(a) Any provision of a governing document that arbitrarily or unreasonably restricts an owner’s ability to market the owner’s interest in a common interest development is void.

(b) No association may adopt, enforce, or otherwise impose any governing document that does either of the following:

(1) Imposes an assessment or fee in
connection with the marketing of an owner’s interest in an amount that exceeds the association’s actual or direct costs.

(2) Establishes an exclusive relationship with a real estate broker through which the sale or marketing of interests in the development is required to occur. The limitation set forth in this paragraph does not apply to the sale or marketing of separate interests owned by the association or to the sale or marketing of common area by the association.

(c) For purposes of this section, “market” and “marketing” mean listing, advertising, or obtaining or providing access to show the owner’s interest in the development.

(d) This section does not apply to rules or regulations made pursuant to Section 712 or 713 regarding real estate signs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6712.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a provision of the governing documents shall be void and unenforceable if it does any of the following:

(1) Prohibits, or includes conditions that have the effect of prohibiting, the use of low water-using plants as a group.

(2) Has the effect of prohibiting or restricting compliance with either of
the following:

(A) A water-efficient landscape ordinance adopted or in effect pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 65595 of the Government Code.

(B) Any regulation or restriction on the use of water adopted pursuant to Section 353 or 375 of the Water Code.

(b) This section shall not prohibit an association from applying landscaping rules established in the governing documents, to the extent the rules fully conform with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6713.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of any interest in a common interest development, and any provision of a governing document, as defined in Section 6552, that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts the installation or use of an electric vehicle charging station in an owner’s designated parking space, including, but not limited to, a
deeded parking space, a parking space in an owner’s exclusive use common area, or a parking space that is specifically designated for use by a particular owner, or is in conflict with the provisions of this section is void and unenforceable.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on electric vehicle charging stations. However, it is the policy of the state to promote, encourage, and remove obstacles to the use of electric vehicle charging stations.

(2) For purposes of this section, “reasonable restrictions” are restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of the station or significantly decrease its efficiency or specified performance.

(c) An electric vehicle charging station shall meet applicable health and safety standards and
requirements imposed by state and local authorities, and all other applicable zoning, land use or other ordinances, or land use permits.

(d) For purposes of this section, “electric vehicle charging station” means a station that is designed in compliance with the California Building Standards Code and delivers electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle into one or more electric vehicles. An electric vehicle charging station may include several charge points simultaneously connecting several electric vehicles to the station and any related equipment needed to facilitate charging plug-in electric vehicles.

(e) If approval is required for the installation or use of an electric vehicle charging station, the application for approval shall be processed and approved by the association in the same manner as an application for approval of an architectural modification to the
property, and shall not be willfully avoided or delayed. The approval or denial of an application shall be in writing. If an application is not denied in writing within 60 days from the date of receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed approved, unless that delay is the result of a reasonable request for additional information.

(f) If the electric vehicle charging station is to be placed in a common area or an exclusive use common area, as designated in the common interest development’s declaration, the following provisions apply:

(1) The owner first shall obtain approval from the association to install the electric vehicle charging station and the association shall approve the installation if the owner agrees in writing to do all of the following:

(A) Comply with the association’s architectural
standards for the installation of the charging station.

(B) Engage a licensed contractor to install the charging station.

(C) Within 14 days of approval, provide a certificate of insurance that names the association as an additional insured under the owner’s insurance policy in the amount set forth in paragraph (3).

(D) Pay for the electricity usage associated with the charging station.

(2) The owner and each successive owner of the charging station shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Costs for damage to the charging station, common area, exclusive use common area, or separate interests resulting from the installation, maintenance, repair, removal, or replacement of the
charging station.

(B) Costs for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the charging station until it has been removed and for the restoration of the common area after removal.

(C) The cost of electricity associated with the charging station.

(D) Disclosing to prospective buyers the existence of any charging station of the owner and the related responsibilities of the owner under this section.

(3) The owner and each successive owner of the charging station, at all times, shall maintain a liability coverage policy in the amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000), and shall name the association as a named additional insured under the policy with a right to notice of cancellation.

(4) An
owner shall not be required to maintain a liability coverage policy for an existing National Electrical Manufacturers Association standard alternating current power plug.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (h), installation of an electric vehicle charging station for the exclusive use of an owner in a common area, that is not an exclusive use common area, shall be authorized by the association only if installation in the owner’s designated parking space is impossible or unreasonably expensive. In such cases, the association shall enter into a license agreement with the owner for the use of the space in a common area, and the owner shall comply with all of the requirements in subdivision (f).

(h) The association or owners may install an electric vehicle charging station in the common area for the use of all members of the association and, in that case, the association shall
develop appropriate terms of use for the charging station.

(i) An association may create a new parking space where one did not previously exist to facilitate the installation of an electric vehicle charging station.

(j) An association that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the applicant or other party for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the applicant or other party in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(k) In any action to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Modification of Separate Interest [6714. - 6714.]

6714.

(a) Subject to the governing documents and applicable law, a member may do the following:

(1) Make any improvement or alteration within the boundaries of the member’s separate interest that does not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portions of the common interest development.

(2) Modify
the member’s separate interest, at the member’s expense, to facilitate access for persons who are blind, visually handicapped, deaf, or physically disabled, or to alter conditions which could be hazardous to these persons. These modifications may also include modifications of the route from the public way to the door of the separate interest for the purposes of this paragraph if the separate interest is on the ground floor or already accessible by an existing ramp or elevator. The right granted by this paragraph is subject to the following conditions:

(A) The modifications shall be consistent with applicable building code requirements.

(B) The modifications shall be consistent with the intent of otherwise applicable provisions of the governing documents pertaining to safety or aesthetics.

(C) Modifications external
to the separate interest shall not prevent reasonable passage by other residents, and shall be removed by the member when the separate interest is no longer occupied by persons requiring those modifications who are blind, visually handicapped, deaf, or physically disabled.

(D) Any member who intends to modify a separate interest pursuant to this paragraph shall submit plans and specifications to the association for review to determine whether the modifications will comply with the provisions of this paragraph. The association shall not deny approval of the proposed modifications under this paragraph without good cause.

(b) Any change in the exterior appearance of a separate interest shall be in accordance with the governing documents and applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Maintenance [6716. - 6722.]

6716.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the declaration of a common interest development, the association is responsible for repairing, replacing, or maintaining the common area, other than exclusive use common area, and the owner of each separate interest is responsible for maintaining that separate interest and any exclusive use common area appurtenant to the separate interest.

(b) The costs of temporary
relocation during the repair and maintenance of the areas within the responsibility of the association shall be borne by the owner of the separate interest affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6718.

(a) In a condominium project or stock cooperative, unless otherwise provided in the declaration, the association is responsible for the repair and maintenance of the common area occasioned by the presence of wood-destroying pests or organisms.

(b) In a planned development, unless a different maintenance scheme is provided in the declaration, each owner of a separate interest is responsible for the
repair and maintenance of that separate interest as may be occasioned by the presence of wood-destroying pests or organisms. Upon approval of the majority of all members of the association, pursuant to Section 6522, that responsibility may be delegated to the association, which shall be entitled to recover the cost thereof as a special assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6720.

(a) The association may cause the temporary, summary removal of any occupant of a common interest development for such periods and at such times as may be necessary for prompt, effective treatment of wood-destroying pests or organisms.

(b) The association shall give notice of the need to temporarily vacate a separate interest to the occupants and to the owners, not less than 15 days nor more than 30
days prior to the date of the temporary relocation. The notice shall state the reason for the temporary relocation, the date and time of the beginning of treatment, the anticipated date and time of termination of treatment, and that the occupants will be responsible for their own accommodations during the temporary relocation.

(c) Notice by the association shall be deemed complete upon either:

(1) Personal delivery of a copy of the notice to the occupants, and, if an occupant is not the owner, individual delivery pursuant to Section 6514 of a copy of the notice to the owner.

(2) Individual delivery pursuant to Section 6514 to the occupant at the address of the separate interest, and, if the occupant is not the owner, individual delivery pursuant to Section 6514 of a copy of the notice to the owner.

(d) For purposes of this section, “occupant” means an owner, resident, guest, invitee, tenant, lessee, sublessee, or other person in possession of the separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6722.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the declaration, a member is entitled to reasonable access to the common area for the purpose of maintaining the internal and external telephone wiring made part of the exclusive use common area of the member’s separate interest pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 6550. The access shall be subject to the consent of the association, whose approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, and which may include the association’s approval of telephone
wiring upon the exterior of the common area, and other conditions as the association determines reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Association Governance [6750. - 6760.]



  ARTICLE 1. Association Existence and Powers [6750. - 6752.]

6750.

A common interest development shall be managed by an association that may be incorporated or unincorporated. The association may be referred to as an owners’ association or a community association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6752.

(a) Unless the governing documents provide otherwise, and regardless of whether the association is incorporated or unincorporated, the association may exercise the powers granted to a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, as enumerated in Section 7140 of the Corporations Code, except that an unincorporated association may not adopt or use a corporate seal or issue membership certificates in accordance with Section 7313 of the Corporations Code.

(b) The association, whether incorporated or unincorporated, may exercise the powers granted to an association in this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Record Keeping [6756. - 6756.]

6756.

To be effective, a request to change the member’s information in the association membership list shall be delivered in writing to the association, pursuant to Section 6512.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conflict of Interest [6758. - 6758.]

6758.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and regardless of whether an association is incorporated or unincorporated, the provisions of Sections 7233 and 7234 of the Corporations Code shall apply to any contract or other transaction authorized, approved, or ratified by the board or a committee of the board.

(b) A director or member of a committee shall not vote on any of the following matters:

(1) Discipline of the director or committee member.

(2) An assessment against the director or committee member for damage to the common area or facilities.

(3) A request, by the director or committee member, for a payment plan for overdue assessments.

(4) A decision whether to foreclose on a lien on the separate interest of the director or committee member.

(5) Review of a proposed physical change to the separate interest of the director or committee member.

(6) A grant of exclusive use common area to the director or committee member.

(c) Nothing in this section
limits any other provision of law or the governing documents that govern a decision in which a director may have an interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Government Assistance [6760. - 6760.]

6760.

(a) To assist with the identification of commercial or industrial common interest developments, each association, whether incorporated or unincorporated, shall submit to the Secretary of State, on a form and for a fee, to cover the reasonable cost to the Secretary of State of processing the form, not to exceed thirty dollars ($30), that the Secretary of State shall prescribe, the following information concerning the association and the development that it manages:

(1) A statement that the association is formed to manage a common interest development under the Commercial and Industrial Common Interest Development Act.

(2) The name of the association.

(3) The street address of the business or corporate office of the association, if any.

(4) The street address of the association’s onsite office, if different from the street address of the business or corporate office, or if there is no onsite office, the street address of the responsible officer or managing agent of the association.

(5) The name, address, and either the daytime telephone number or email address of the association’s onsite office or managing agent.

(6) The name, street address, and daytime telephone number of the association’s managing agent, if any.

(7) The county, and, if in an incorporated area, the city in which the development is physically located. If the boundaries of the development are physically located in more than one county, each of the counties in which it is located.

(8) If the development is in an unincorporated area, the city closest in proximity to the development.

(9) The front street and nearest cross street of the physical location of the development.

(10) The type of common interest development managed by the association.

(11) The number of separate interests in the development.

(b) The association shall submit the
 information required by this section as follows:

(1) By incorporated associations, within 90 days after the filing of its original articles of incorporation, and thereafter at the time the association files its statement of principal business activity with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 8210 of the Corporations Code.

(2) By unincorporated associations, in July of 2003, and in that same month biennially thereafter. Upon changing its status to that of a corporation, the association shall comply with the filing deadlines in paragraph (1).

(c) The association shall notify the Secretary of State of any change in the street address of the association’s onsite office or of the responsible officer or managing
 agent of the association in the form and for a fee, to cover the reasonable cost to the Secretary of State of processing the form, prescribed by the Secretary of State, within 60 days of the change.

(d) The penalty for an incorporated association’s noncompliance with the initial or biennial filing requirements of this section shall be suspension of the association’s rights, privileges, and powers as a corporation and monetary penalties, to the same extent and in the same manner as suspension and monetary penalties imposed pursuant to Section 8810 of the Corporations Code.

(e) The statement required by this section may be filed, notwithstanding suspension of the corporate powers, rights, and privileges under this section or under provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Upon
 the filing of a statement under this section by a corporation that has suffered suspension under this section, the Secretary of State shall certify that fact to the Franchise Tax Board and the corporation may thereupon be relieved from suspension, unless the corporation is held in suspension by the Franchise Tax Board by reason of Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) Whenever any form is filed pursuant to this section, it supersedes any previously filed form.

(g) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any form filed pursuant to this section after it has been superseded by the filing of a new form.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 54) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 2.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Assessments and Assessment Collection [6800. - 6828.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment and Imposition of Assessments [6800. - 6804.]

6800.

The association shall levy regular and special assessments sufficient to perform its obligations under the governing documents and this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6804.

(a) Regular assessments imposed or collected to perform the obligations of an association under the governing documents or this act shall be exempt from execution by a judgment creditor of the association only to the extent necessary for the association to perform essential services, such as paying for utilities and insurance. In determining the appropriateness of an exemption, a court shall ensure that only essential services are protected under this
subdivision.

(b) This exemption shall not apply to any consensual pledges, liens, or encumbrances that have been approved by a majority of a quorum of members, pursuant to Section 6524, at a member meeting or election, or to any state tax lien, or to any lien for labor or materials supplied to the common area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessment Payment and Delinquency [6808. - 6819.]

6808.
